Utah, session 2026, SB258.
Section 1. Section 63A-17-806 is amended to read:63A-17-806. Definitions -- Infant at Work Program -- Administration.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Agency head" means the individual who serves as the chief executive officer or chief administrative officer of an executive branch agency.(b)"Eligible employee" means an employee who has been employed by the Department of Health and Human Servicesa participating agency for a minimum of:(i)12 consecutive months; and(ii)1,250 hours, excluding paid time off during the 12-month period immediately preceding the day on which the employee applies for participation in the program.(c)"Executive branch agency" means any department, agency, office, or other administrative unit of the state executive branch with authority to employ personnel.(b)(d)"Infant" means a baby that is at least six weeks of ageold and no more than six months of ageold.(c)(e)"Parent" means:(i)a biological or adoptive parent of an infant; or(ii)an individual who has an infant placed in the individual's foster care by the Division of Child and Family Services.(f)"Participating agency" means an executive branch agency that participates in the program.(d)(g)"Program" means the Infant at Work Pilot Program established in this section.(2)There is created the Infant at Work Pilot Program for eligible employees.(3)The Department of Health and Human Services is a participating agency under this section.(4)(a)An executive branch agency may elect to participate in the program by submitting written notice to the division by the agency head.(b)An executive branch agency's participation in the program under Subsection (4)(a) is subject to:(i)approval by the division; and(ii)compliance with this section and rules made by the division under Subsection (11).(3)(5)The program shall:(a)allow an eligible employee to bring the eligible employee's infant to work subject to the provisions ofin accordance with this section; and(b)be administered by the division; and.(c)be implemented for a minimum of one year.(4)(6)The division shall establish an application process for eligible employees of the Department of Health and Human Servicesan eligible employee of a participating agency to apply to the program that includes:(a)a process for evaluating whether an eligible employee's work environment is appropriate for an infant;(b)(a)guidelines for infant health and safety; and(c)(b)guidelines regarding an eligible employee's initial and ongoing participation in the program.(7)(a)A participating agency shall determine whether an eligible employee who applies to the program under Subsection (6) may participate in the program based on:(i)the eligible employee's work environment; and(ii)the participating agency's operational needs.(5)(b)If the division approves thea participating agency approves an eligible employee for participation in the program, the eligible employee shall have the sole responsibility for the care and safety of the infant at the workplace.(6)(8)The division may not require the Department of Health and Human Servicesa participating agency to designate or set aside space for an eligible employee's infant other than the eligible employee's existing work space.(9)The division may withdraw or revoke a participating agency's approval to participate in the program if the division determines that the participating agency:(a)is not in compliance with this section or rules made by the division under Subsection (11); or(b)participates in a manner that is detrimental to the effective administration of the program.(10)(a)A participating agency shall, in consultation with the division, adopt a written policy consistent with this section that provides guidance to eligible employees who seek to participate in the program.(b)A policy adopted under Subsection (10)(a) shall:(i)be approved by the division;(ii)incorporate the application process established by the division under Subsection (6);(iii)describe the criteria the participating agency will use in making an approval determination under Subsection (7);(iv)provide for revocation of an eligible employee's approval if participation in the program becomes detrimental to the work environment or business operations;(v)provide that an eligible employee may request temporary telework or remote work in connection with participation in the program, subject to the approval and operational needs of the participating agency; and(vi)establish general participation requirements with which an employee who brings an infant to the workplace, and any alternate care provider, shall comply. including requirements relating to:(A)infant health and safety; and(B)an eligible employee's initial and ongoing participating in the program.(11)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules necessary to administer the program.(7)The division, in consultation with the Department of Health and Human Services, shall make rules that the department determines necessary to establish the program in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-1-263 is amended to read:63I-1-263. Repeal dates: Titles 63A to 63O.(1)Section 63A-17-806, Definitions -- Infant at Work Program -- Administration, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Title 63C, Chapter 4a, Constitutional and Federalism Defense Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)(3)Title 63C, Chapter 18, Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026.(3)(4)Title 63C, Chapter 25, State Finance Review Commission, is repealed July 1, 2027.(4)(5)Title 63C, Chapter 27, Cybersecurity Commission, is repealed July 1, 2032.(5)(6)Title 63C, Chapter 28, Ethnic Studies Commission, is repealed July 1, 2026.(6)(7)Title 63C, Chapter 31, State Employee Benefits Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2028.(7)(8)Section 63G-6a-805, Purchase from community rehabilitation programs, is repealed July 1, 2026.(8)(9)Title 63G, Chapter 21, Agreements to Provide State Services, is repealed July 1, 2028.(9)(10)Title 63H, Chapter 4, Heber Valley Historic Railroad Authority, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)(11)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(16), related to the Communication Habits to reduce Adolescent Threats (CHAT) Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(11)(12)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(26), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(12)(13)Section 63L-11-204, Canyon resource management plan, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)(14)Title 63L, Chapter 11, Part 4, Resource Development Coordinating Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)(15)Title 63M, Chapter 7, Part 7, Domestic Violence Offender Treatment Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)(16)Section 63M-7-902, Creation -- Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(16)(17)Title 63M, Chapter 11, Utah Commission on Aging, is repealed July 1, 2026.(17)(18)Title 63N, Chapter 2, Part 2, Enterprise Zone Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(18)(19)Subsection 63N-2-511(1)(b), regarding the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(19)(20)Section 63N-2-512, Hotel Impact Mitigation Fund, is repealed July 1, 2028.(20)(21)Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 9, Strategic Innovation Grant Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(21)(22)Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 11, Manufacturing Modernization Grant Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(22)(23)Title 63N, Chapter 4, Part 4, Rural Employment Expansion Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(23)(24)Section 63N-4-804, Rural Opportunity Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(24)(25)Subsection 63N-4-805(5)(b), regarding the Rural Employment Expansion Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(25)(26)Subsection 63N-7-101(1), regarding the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(26)(27)Subsection 63N-7-102(3)(c), regarding a requirement for the Utah Office of Tourism to receive approval from the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(27)(28)Title 63N, Chapter 7, Part 2, Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 63I-2-263 is amended to read:63I-2-263. Repeal dates: Titles 63A through 63O.(1)Title 63A, Chapter 2, Part 5, Educational Interpretation and Translation Services Procurement Advisory Council is repealed July 1, 2025.(2)(1)Section 63A-5b-807, Eminent domain of unincorporated city owned land, is repealed January 1, 2027.(3)Section 63A-17-806, Definitions -- Infant at Work Pilot Program -- Administration -- Report, is repealed June 30, 2026.(4)Section 63C-1-103, Appointment and terms of boards, committees, councils, and commissions transitioning on October 1, 2024, or December 31, 2024, is repealed July 1, 2025.(5)Section 63C-1-104, Appointment and terms of boards transitioning on October 1, 2024, is repealed January 1, 2025.(6)Subsection 63G-6a-802(1)(e), regarding a procurement for a presidential debate, is repealed January 1, 2025.(7)Subsection 63G-6a-802(3)(b)(iii), regarding a procurement for a presidential debate, is repealed January 1, 2025.(8)(2)Subsection 63H-7a-403(2)(b), regarding the charge to maintain the public safety communications network, is repealed July 1, 2033.(9)(3)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(30), regarding funding the Enterprise Zone Act, is repealed December 31, 2026.(10)(4)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(46), regarding appropriations to the State Tax Commission for deferral reimbursements, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Section 63M-7-221, Expungement working group, is repealed April 30, 2025.(12)(5)Title 63N, Chapter 2, Part 2, Enterprise Zone Act, is repealed December 31, 2026.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.